District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.85

Interpretation of chapter.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make it uniform with similar laws enacted by the several states.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 140, ch. 222, § 85
1981 Ed., § 40-482.
1973 Ed., § 40-498.